California statutes. Education Code
 equivalent of the amount that would be payable to the participant if the participant elected to receive the disability benefit in a lump-sum payment, modified to be payable over the combined lives of the participant and the participant’s annuity beneficiary. Upon the death of the participant, the monthly amount that was payable to the participant shall be paid monthly to the participant’s annuity beneficiary. However, if the annuity beneficiary predeceases the participant, the annuity payable to the participant shall be the single life annuity with a cash refund feature that would have been payable had the participant elected that form of payment at the commencement of the benefit. That single life annuity shall be payable as of the day following the date of the annuity beneficiary’s death upon receipt by the system of proof of the annuity beneficiary’s death. If the annuity beneficiary predeceases the
 participant, the participant may designate a new annuity beneficiary. The effective date of the new designation shall be six months following the date notification, on a properly executed form, is received by the board, provided both the participant and the new designated annuity beneficiary are then living. The designation of the new annuity beneficiary under this paragraph shall be subject to an actuarial modification of the single life annuity with a cash refund feature and shall not result in any additional liability to the fund. The new annuity beneficiary shall not be an existing annuity beneficiary.

(4) A 50-percent joint and survivor annuity with a “pop-up” feature. This form of payment is the actuarial equivalent of the amount that would be payable to the participant if the participant elected to receive the disability benefit in a
 lump-sum payment, modified to be payable over the combined lives of the participant and the participant’s annuity beneficiary. Upon the death of the participant, one-half of the monthly amount that was payable to the participant shall be paid monthly to the participant’s annuity beneficiary. However, if the annuity beneficiary predeceases the participant, the annuity payable to the participant shall be the single life annuity with a cash refund feature that would have been payable had the participant elected that form of payment at the commencement of the benefit. That single life annuity shall be payable as of the day following the date of the annuity beneficiary’s death upon receipt by the system of proof of the annuity beneficiary’s death. If the annuity beneficiary predeceases the participant, the participant may designate a new annuity beneficiary. The effective date of the new designation
 shall be six months following the date notification, on a properly executed form, is received by the board, provided both the participant and the new designated annuity beneficiary are then living. The designation of the new annuity beneficiary under this paragraph shall be subject to an actuarial modification of the single life annuity with a cash refund feature and shall not result in any additional liability to the fund. The new annuity beneficiary shall not be an existing annuity beneficiary.

(5) A period certain annuity. This form of payment is an annuity equal to the actuarial equivalent of the sum of balance of the employee account and the employer account on the date the disability benefit becomes payable. The annuity shall be payable in whole year increments over a period of years specified by the participant, from a minimum of
 three years to a maximum of 10 years subject to life expectancy tables promulgated pursuant to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code. If the participant’s death occurs prior to the end of the period certain, the remaining balance of payments shall be paid to the participant’s beneficiary pursuant to Section 27007.

(c) Except as described in subdivision (c) of Section 26906.5, on or after January 1, 2007, a participant may not make a new election of an annuity described in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 25.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

26906.5.

(a) Upon application for a disability benefit under this part, the participant may elect to receive the disabled benefit in the form of an annuity provided the sum of the employee account and employer account equals or exceeds three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500). If the participant elects to receive the disability benefit as an annuity, the participant shall elect one of the following forms of payment:

(1) Participant only annuity. This is a single life annuity with a cash refund feature that is the actuarial equivalent of the amount that would be payable to the participant if the participant elected to receive the disability
 benefit in a lump-sum payment. Upon the death of the participant, an amount equal to the remaining balance of the participant’s contributions and interest shall be paid in a lump sum to the participant’s beneficiary.

(2) One hundred percent beneficiary annuity. This is a joint and survivor annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the lump-sum payment modified to be payable over the combined lives of the participant and the participant’s annuity beneficiary. Upon the death of the participant, 100 percent of the monthly amount that was payable to the participant shall be paid monthly to the participant’s surviving annuity beneficiary.

(3) Seventy-five percent beneficiary annuity. This is a joint and survivor annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the lump-sum payment modified to
 be payable over the combined lives of the participant and the participant’s annuity beneficiary. Pursuant to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, unless the annuity
 beneficiary is the participant’s spouse or former spouse who has been awarded a community property interest in the participant’s benefits under this part, the participant may not designate an annuity beneficiary under this annuity who is more than exactly 19 years younger than the participant. Upon the death of the participant, 75 percent of the monthly amount that was payable to the participant shall be paid monthly to the participant’s surviving annuity beneficiary.

(4) Fifty percent beneficiary annuity. This is a joint and survivor annuity that is the actuarial equivalent of the lump-sum payment modified to be payable over the combined lives of the participant and the participant’s annuity beneficiary. Upon the death of the participant, 50 percent of the monthly amount that was payable to the participant shall be paid
 monthly to the participant’s surviving annuity beneficiary.

(5) A period certain annuity. This form of payment is an annuity that is equal to the actuarial equivalent of the balance of credits in the participant’s Cash Balance Benefit account on the date the disability benefit becomes payable. The annuity shall be payable in whole year increments over a period of years specified by the participant, from a minimum of three years to a maximum of 10 years subject to life expectancy tables promulgated pursuant to Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code. If the participant’s death occurs prior to the end of the period certain, the remaining balance of payments shall be paid to the participant’s beneficiary pursuant to Section 27007.

(b) If an annuity beneficiary
 designated pursuant to paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a) predeceases the participant, the annuity shall be paid to the participant as the participant only annuity described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) that would have been payable had the participant elected that form of payment at the commencement of the benefit. That participant only annuity shall be payable as of the day following the date of the annuity beneficiary’s death upon receipt by the system of proof of the annuity beneficiary’s death. If the annuity beneficiary predeceases the participant, the participant may designate a new annuity beneficiary. The effective date of the new designation shall be six months following the date notification is received by the board, provided both the participant and the new designated annuity
 beneficiary are then living. Notice to the board of the death of the annuity beneficiary shall be on a properly executed form provided by the system. The designation of the new annuity beneficiary under this paragraph is subject to an actuarial modification of the participant only annuity and may not result in any additional liability to the fund.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 297 or 299.2 of the Family Code, a spouse as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) does not include the domestic partner of the participant pursuant to Section 7 of Title 1 of the United States Code.

(d) If there is a determination of community property rights as described in Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 27400) of this part on or before December 31, 2006, the participant may elect the
 annuity that is required by the judgment or court order. Nothing in this part shall permit the participant to change the annuity to the detriment of the community property interest of the nonparticipant spouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 26.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

26906.6.

(a) A participant who is disabled and elected an annuity pursuant to Section 26906 may elect to change annuities, subject to all of the following:

(1) A participant who elected a single life annuity with or without a cash refund feature or a period certain annuity may not change his or her annuity.

(2) A participant who elected an annuity under paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 26906 may elect an annuity under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 26906.5.

(3) The election by the participant under this section is made on or after January 1, 2007, and prior to July 1,
 2007.

(4) The participant designates the same annuity beneficiary that was designated under the prior annuity elected by the participant, if the annuity and the annuity beneficiary designation were effective on December 31, 2006.

(5) The annuity beneficiary is not afflicted with a known terminal illness and the participant declares, under penalty of perjury under the laws of this state, that to the best of his or her knowledge, the annuity beneficiary is not afflicted with a known terminal illness.

(6) The annuity beneficiary has not predeceased the participant as of the effective date of the change in the annuity by the participant.

(b) The change in the annuity by the participant shall be effective on the date the election is signed, provided that the
 election is on a properly executed form provided by the system and that election is received at the system’s headquarters office within 30 days after the date the election is signed.

(c) After receipt of a participant’s election document, the system shall mail an acknowledgment notice to the participant that sets forth the new annuity elected by the participant.

(d) If the participant and the annuity beneficiary are alive and not afflicted with a known terminal illness, a participant may cancel the election to change annuities and elect to receive the benefit according to the preexisting annuity election. After cancellation, the participant may elect to make a one-time change from the preexisting annuity to any other annuity provided by and subject to the restrictions of paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a). The cancellation or the cancellation and one-time change
 shall be made on a properly executed form provided by the system and shall be received at the system’s headquarters office no later than 30 calendar days following the date of mailing of the acknowledgment notice. If the participant elects to make the one-time change provided by this subdivision, the change shall be effective as of the participant’s signature date on the initial election to change.

(e) If the system is unable to mail an acknowledgment notice to the participant on or before June 1, 2007, or prior to the end of the election period, provided that the participant and the annuity beneficiary are alive and not afflicted with a known terminal illness, the system shall allow a participant to cancel the election to change annuities and elect to receive the benefit according to the preexisting annuity election. After cancellation, the participant may elect to make a one-time change from the preexisting annuity to any other annuity
 provided by and subject to the restrictions of paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a). The cancellation or the cancellation and one-time change may be made after the end of the election period if it is made on a properly executed form provided by the system and is received at the system’s headquarters office no later than 30 calendar days following the date of mailing of the acknowledgment notice. If the participant elects to make the one-time change provided by this subdivision, the change shall be effective as of the participant’s signature date on the initial election to change.

(f) If the participant elects to change his or her annuity as described in subdivision (a) or (d), the participant’s annuity shall be modified in a manner determined by the board to prevent any additional liability to the plan.

(g) The participant shall not change annuities in derogation of
 a spouse’s or former spouse’s community property rights as specified in a court order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 123, Sec. 38.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

26907.

The annuity under this chapter shall be determined as a value actuarially equivalent to the sum of the employee account and the employer account as of the disability date. The annuity shall be calculated using the age of the participant and, if the participant elected a joint and survivor option, the age of the beneficiary on the disability date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26908.

Upon election of an annuity under this part, the credits in the participant’s employee account and employer account shall be transferred to the Annuitant Reserve.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 288.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26910.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the beneficiary under the joint and survivor option elected pursuant to paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 26906 or paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 26906.5 shall be the person or trust designated by the participant on the application for a disability benefit under this part, and shall not be changed after the original disability date unless the beneficiary has predeceased the participant.

(b) (1) A participant may change the annuity beneficiary designated pursuant to this section without penalty by designating a trust as beneficiary if all of the following requirements are
 met:

(A) The trust conforms to the definition of trust in Section 26105.5.

(B) The beneficiary of the trust is the same person as the previously named annuity beneficiary.

(C) The member files an application and any required documents in a form prescribed by the system.

(2) If a trust is determined to be invalid or terminates after the system commences payment to the trust, beginning on the effective date of termination of the trust, the benefit shall be paid to, and all associated rights and responsibilities shall accrue to, the beneficiary of the trust so long as that beneficiary is eligible to receive a benefit pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 559, Sec. 16.   (AB 1875)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26911.

If a participant who is receiving a disability annuity under this part becomes reemployed to perform creditable service subject to coverage by the Cash Balance Benefit Program or the Defined Benefit Program, the disability annuity shall be terminated. The participant’s employee account and employer account shall be credited with the actuarial equivalent of the participant’s annuity as of the date of reemployment and the Annuitant Reserve shall be reduced by the amount credited to those accounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 55.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Death Benefit [27000. - 27008.]

27000.

The death benefit shall become payable to the beneficiary upon receipt of proof of the participant’s death.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

27001.

Notwithstanding Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13100) of Part 1 of Division 8 of the Probate Code or any other provision of law to the contrary, the death benefit payable under the Cash Balance Benefit Program may be requested by the beneficiary and paid by the system as soon as practicable after the system receives proof of the participant’s death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 27.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

27002.

If the participant died prior to commencement of an annuity, the death benefit shall be an amount that is equal to the sum of the participant’s employee account and employer account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

27003.

The normal form of death benefit under this part is a lump-sum payment. Upon distribution of the lump-sum payment to the beneficiary, no further benefits shall be payable from the plan with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 291.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

27004.

(a) A beneficiary, other than an entity except a trust as defined in Section 26106.5, may elect to receive the final benefit payable under the Cash Balance Benefit Program as an annuity payable in monthly installments provided that the sum of the employee account and the employer account that is payable to the beneficiary equals at least three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500).

(b) A beneficiary who elects to receive an annuity pursuant to this section shall elect a period certain annuity. This form of payment is an annuity equal to the actuarial equivalent of the sum of the balance of the employee account and the employer account on the date of the participant’s death. The
 annuity shall be payable in whole year increments over a period of years specified by the beneficiary, from a minimum of three years to a maximum of 10 years. However, the annuity period shall not exceed the life expectancy of the beneficiary of the trust that is beneficiary with respect to the trust’s interest in the plan.

 (c) The beneficiary may designate a payee to receive the remaining balance of payments if the beneficiary dies prior to the end of the period certain. Unless otherwise specified in the trust instrument, the trustee or beneficiary of the trust that is an annuity beneficiary is entitled to name a subsequent beneficiary if the trust is valid. If the trust is determined to be invalid or terminated, any election by the trustee pursuant to this subdivision shall be void and the beneficiary shall be entitled to exercise all rights provided to annuity beneficiaries under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 559, Sec. 17.   (AB 1875)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

27005.

The annuity elected under this chapter shall be determined as a value actuarially equivalent to the sum of the participant’s employee account and employer account as of the date the death benefit becomes payable. The annuity shall be calculated using the age of the beneficiary on the date the benefit becomes payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

27006.

Upon the beneficiary’s election to receive the death benefit under this part in the form of an annuity, the credits in the participant’s employee account and employer account shall be transferred to the Annuitant Reserve.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 292.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

27007.

(a) If the participant died while receiving an annuity under this part, the death benefit shall be payable in accordance with the terms of the annuity elected by the participant.

(b) Upon the death of a participant who elected a single life annuity with a cash refund feature under this part, any balance remaining in the participant’s employee account and employer account shall be payable in a lump sum to the beneficiary.

(c) Upon the death of a participant who elected a single life annuity without a cash refund feature under this part, no death benefit shall be payable.

(d) Upon the death of a participant who elected a joint and survivor annuity under this part, the annuity shall continue for life to the surviving beneficiary under the joint and survivor option. If the beneficiary under the joint and survivor option has predeceased the participant, no death benefit shall be payable.

(e) Upon the death of a participant who elected a period certain annuity under this part prior to the completion of annuity payments due the participant, the remaining balance of payments shall be paid to the beneficiary designated by the participant pursuant to Section 27100.

(1) If the beneficiary is a person, the remaining period certain annuity payments shall be made over the amount of time remaining in
 the period originally elected by the deceased member and shall be made in payments equal to the amount of the annuity payments previously received by the deceased member.

(2) If the beneficiary is not a person, the remaining balance of period certain annuity payments shall be made in a lump-sum payment equal to the present value of the balance of payments due over the time remaining in the period originally elected by the deceased member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 28.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

27008.

Upon the death of a beneficiary who was receiving an annuity under this part due to the death of a participant, payment shall be made as follows:

(a) Upon the death of a beneficiary under a joint and survivor option, no amount shall be payable.

(b) Upon the death of a beneficiary who elected a single life annuity without a cash refund feature, no amount shall be payable.

(c) Upon the death of a beneficiary who was receiving a period certain annuity, the actuarial equivalent of the remaining balance of payments shall be paid in a lump sum to the estate of the beneficiary unless the beneficiary designated a payee to receive the remaining balance of payments as provided in Section 27004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 803, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Beneficiary [27100. - 27102.]

27100.

A participant may at any time designate or change the designation of one or more primary beneficiaries and one or more contingent beneficiaries to receive any lump-sum death benefit that may be payable under the plan. The beneficiary shall be designated on a form prescribed by the system that is received by the system before the participant’s death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 231, Sec. 4.   (AB 1824)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

27100.5.

A corporation, trust, charitable organization, parochial institution, or public entity may be designated as a beneficiary under this part, but shall not be designated as an annuity beneficiary, except a trust as defined in Section 26106.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 231, Sec. 5.   (AB 1824)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

27101.

In the event the participant dies without a valid beneficiary designation on file with the system, any lump-sum death benefit under this part shall be payable to the estate of the participant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 296.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

27102.

Part 5 (commencing with Section 220) of Division 2 of the Probate Code, when applicable, shall govern the distribution of any lump-sum death benefit payable under this part. In applying Part 5 (commencing with Section 220) of Division 2 of the Probate Code with respect to proceeds payable to a beneficiary, participation in the plan shall be considered as having the same status as an insurance policy issued after December 31, 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Termination Benefit [27200. - 27207.]

27200.

Upon termination of all creditable service subject to coverage by the plan under this part and Part 13 (commencing with Section 22000) for any reason other than death, disability, or retirement, a participant may apply for a lump-sum termination benefit under this part which shall be an amount that is equal to the sum of the participant’s employee account and the employer account as of the date the termination benefit is paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 297.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

27201.

(a) All creditable service subject to coverage by the Cash Balance Benefit Program and the Defined Benefit Program, which does not include retired member activities as defined in Section 22164.5 or retired participant activities as defined in Section 26135.7, shall terminate prior to application for a termination benefit under this part.

(b) All employers with which the participant is employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage by the plan shall certify in a format prescribed by the system that the participant’s employment has been terminated unless the employment was terminated 12 months or more prior to the date the termination benefit application is received by the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 231, Sec. 6.   (AB 1824)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

27202.

A participant shall apply for a termination benefit under this part on a form prescribed by the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 96, Sec. 24.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

27203.

A participant may not apply for a termination benefit under this part if less than five years have elapsed following the date the most recent termination benefit was distributed to the participant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 300.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

27204.

(a) The termination benefit under this part shall not be payable before 180 calendar days have elapsed following the date of termination of employment.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the application for the termination benefit shall be automatically canceled if the participant performs creditable service within 180 calendar days following the date of termination of employment.

(c) Subdivision (b) does not apply if the participant has reached that age at which the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 requires a distribution of benefits. A participant who has reached this age shall
 receive a distribution commencing on the earlier of the date that the participant has met the conditions of subdivision (a) or the conditions of subdivision (c) of Section 26004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 275, Sec. 23.   (AB 2101)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

27205.

A participant may cancel the application for a termination benefit under this part at any time prior to distribution of the benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 302.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

27206.

No partial distribution shall be made from an employee account or employer account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

27207.

Upon distribution of the lump-sum payment to the participant under this part, no further benefits shall be payable from the plan under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 303.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Distribution of Benefits [27300. - 27303.5.]

27300.

(a) The plan’s obligations under this part to a participant or beneficiary who has applied for a benefit cease upon distribution of the lump-sum benefit.

(b) Deposit in the United States mail of a warrant drawn as directed by the participant or beneficiary and addressed as directed by the participant or beneficiary constitutes distribution of the benefits under this part.

(c) Deposit in the United States mail of a notice that the requested electronic funds transfer has been made as directed by the participant or beneficiary constitutes distribution of the benefits under this part.

(d) If the participant or beneficiary has elected to transfer all or a specified portion of the lump-sum benefit that is eligible for direct trustee-to-trustee transfer to the trustee of an eligible retirement plan within the meaning of Section 401(a)(31) of Title 26 of the United States Code, deposit in the United States mail of a notice that the requested transfer has been made constitutes distribution of the benefits under this part.

(e) Distribution under subdivision (b), (c), or (d) pursuant to the board’s determination in good faith of the existence, identity, or other facts relating to entitlement of persons constitutes a complete discharge and release of the plan from liability for that payment under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 304.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

27301.

(a) The plan’s obligations under this part to a participant or beneficiary who elected to receive a benefit in the form of an annuity, cease upon distribution of the final monthly payment of the annuity.

(b) Deposit in the United States mail of a warrant drawn as directed by the participant or beneficiary and addressed as directed by the participant or beneficiary constitutes distribution of the benefit under this part.

(c) Deposit in the United States mail of a notice that the requested electronic funds transfer has been made as directed by the participant or beneficiary constitutes distribution of the benefit under this part.

(d) Distribution under subdivision (b) or (c) pursuant to the board’s determination in good faith of the existence, identity, or other facts relating to entitlement of persons constitutes a complete discharge and release of the board, system, and plan from liability for payments under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

27302.

If a benefit payable under this part cannot be distributed because, after a good faith effort, the participant or beneficiary cannot be located, the balances in the participant’s employee account and employer account shall be forfeited by the participant or beneficiary, but if the participant or beneficiary thereafter submits a valid claim to the system the employee and employer accounts shall be reinstated and shall be credited with all applicable interest at the minimum interest rate and additional earnings credit amounts attributable to the period during which the forfeiture was in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 305.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

27303.

Any overpayment to a participant or beneficiary under this part shall be deducted from any subsequent benefit payment that may be payable under the plan, except as provided in Section 27303.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 207, Sec. 27.   (AB 2260)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

27303.5.

If an employer reports erroneous information, the system shall calculate the actuarial present value of the expected payments from the participant or beneficiary pursuant to Sections 22008 and 24617. The employer shall pay the difference between the total amount of the overpayment and the calculation of the actuarial present value of expected payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 207, Sec. 28.   (AB 2260)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Community Property [27400. - 27413.]

27400.

(a) This chapter establishes the power of a court in a dissolution of marriage or legal separation action with respect to community property rights in benefits under this part and defines the rights of nonparticipant spouses in the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, the termination, dissolution, or nullity of a registered domestic partnership, or the legal separation of partners in a registered domestic partnership, as provided in Section 299 of the Family Code, shall be treated in the same manner as a dissolution of marriage or legal separation of a member and his or her spouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 418, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

27401.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “nonparticipant spouse” means a participant’s spouse or former spouse who is being or has been awarded a community property interest in the benefits determined by reference to the amounts credited to a participant’s employee and employer accounts or the participant’s annuity. A nonparticipant spouse who is awarded separate nominal accounts is not a participant in the Cash Balance Benefit Program. A nonparticipant spouse who receives or is awarded an interest in a participant’s annuity is not a participant in the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, a participant’s registered domestic partner or former registered domestic partner who is being or has been awarded a community property interest in the benefits determined by reference to the amounts credited to a participant’s employee and employer accounts or the participant’s annuity shall be treated in the same manner as a nonparticipant spouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 418, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

27402.

(a) Upon the legal separation or dissolution of marriage of a participant, the court shall include in the judgment or a court order the date on which the parties separated.

(b) The court may order in the judgment or court order that the participant’s employee and employer credits in accounts which are attributable to periods of participation in the plan during the marriage be divided into separate nominal accounts in the name of the participant and the nonparticipant spouse, respectively. Any employee or employer account credits that are not explicitly awarded by the judgment or court order shall be deemed the exclusive property of the participant.

(c) The determination of the court of the community property rights pursuant to this section shall be consistent with this chapter and shall address the rights of the nonparticipant spouse, including, but not limited to, retirement benefits, disability benefits, death benefits, or termination of the benefits of the participant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

27403.

The nonparticipant spouse who is awarded separate nominal accounts pursuant to Section 27402 is not a participant of the Cash Balance Benefit Program. The nonparticipant spouse is entitled only to rights and benefits explicitly established by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

27404.

The nonparticipant spouse is entitled to no benefits or rights from the separate nominal accounts except as otherwise provided in this chapter. However, this section shall not be construed to limit any right arising from the accounts of a nonparticipant with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program which exists because the nonparticipant spouse is employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage by the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 309.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

27405.

Upon the legal separation or dissolution of marriage of a participant, the court may include in the judgment or court order a determination of the community property rights of the parties in the participant’s annuity consistent with this section. Upon election under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 2610 of the Family Code, the court order awarding the nonparticipant spouse a community property share in the benefits of a participant receiving an annuity shall be consistent with this section.

(a) If the court does not award the entire annuity to the participant and the participant is receiving an annuity under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 26807 or paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 26807.5, the court shall require only that the system pay from the plan the nonparticipant spouse, by separate warrant, his or her community property share of the participant’s annuity, or the option beneficiary’s annuity or both.

(b) The nonparticipant spouse may designate a beneficiary to receive his or her community property share of the participant’s annuity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 655, Sec. 80.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

27406.

The nonparticipant spouse who is awarded separate nominal accounts with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program shall have the right to a lump-sum distribution of amounts credited to the account.

(a) The nonparticipant spouse shall file an application on a form provided by the system to obtain the distribution.

(b) The distribution is effective when the system deposits in the United States mail a warrant drawn in favor of the nonparticipant spouse and addressed to the latest address for the nonparticipant spouse on file with the system.

(c) If the nonparticipant spouse has
 elected on a form provided by the system to transfer all or a specified portion of the accounts that are eligible for direct trustee-to-trustee transfer under Section 401(a)(31) of Title 26 of the United States Code to the trustee of a qualified plan under Section 402 of Title 26 of the United States Code, deposit in the United States mail of a notice that the requested transfer has been made constitutes a distribution of the nonparticipant spouse’s credit balance from the separate nominal accounts. This subdivision shall not apply to a nonparticipant partner consistent with Section 402 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) The nonparticipant spouse is deemed to have permanently waived all rights to an annuity when the distribution becomes effective.

(e) The nonparticipant spouse may not cancel a distribution after the distribution is effective.

(f) The nonparticipant spouse shall have no right to elect to redeposit the distribution after the distribution is effective.
